da: Ædelstenens klarhedsgrad: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Andet
de: Reinheitsgrad des Edelsteins: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Sonstige
nl: Helderheidsgraad van edelsteen: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Overig
vi: Cấp độ tinh khiết của đá quý: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Khác
th: ระดับความใสของอัญมณี: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Gradul de claritate al pietrelor prețioase: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Altele
ja: 宝石の透明度グレード: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; その他
en: Gemstone clarity grade: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Other
ko: 보석 투명도 등급: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; 기타
es: Grado de claridad de la piedra preciosa: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Otro
lt-LT: Brangakmenio skaidrumo lygis: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Kita
hu: Drágakő tisztasági fokozata: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Egyéb
fr: Grade de pureté de la pierre gemme: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Autre
pt-PT: grau de pureza da gema: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Outro
fi: Jalokivien kirkkausaste: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Muu
ru: Класс чистоты драгоценного камня: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Другое
cs: Stupeň čistoty drahokamu: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Ostatní
nb: Klarhetsgrad for edelstener: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Annet
hr-HR: Stupanj čistoće dragog kamenja: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Ostalo
sv: Ädelstenens klarhetsgrad: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Övrigt
tr: Değerli taşın berraklık derecesi: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Diğer
sl-SI: Stopnja čistosti dragulja: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Drugo
zh-CN: 宝石净度等级: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; 其他
bg-BG: Степен на чистота на скъпоценния камък: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Друго
pl: Klasa czystości kamienia szlachetnego: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Inne
zh-TW: 寶石淨度等級: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; 其他
el: Βαθμός καθαρότητας πολύτιμου λίθου: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Άλλο
pt-BR: Grau de pureza da gema: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Outro
it: Grado di purezza della gemma: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Altro
sk-SK: Stupeň čistoty drahokamu: FL; I1; I2; I3; IF; SI1; SI2; VS1; VS2; VVS1; VVS2; Iný